Hawaii statutes.
[§414-148] Greater quorum or voting
requirements. (a) The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater
quorum or voting requirement for shareholders (or voting groups of
shareholders) than is provided for by this chapter.

(b) An amendment to the articles of
incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting
requirement must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same
vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting
requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater. [L
2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next